Utah statutes.
78B-6-313.   Contempt of process of nonjudicial officer -- Procedure.
(1)  If a person, officer, referee, arbitrator, board, or committee with the
authority to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents
issues a subpoena and the person to whom the subpoena is issued refuses to
appear or produce the documents ordered, the person shall be considered in
contempt.
(2)  The person, officer, referee, arbitrator, board, or committee may report
the person to whom the subpoena is issued to the judge of the district court.
The court may then issue a warrant of attachment or order to show cause to
compel the person's appearance.
(3)  When a person charged has been brought up or has appeared, the person's
contempt may be purged in the same manner as other contempts mentioned in this
part.
